New York, session 2025-2026, A10711.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 2164 of the public health law, as 2 amended by chapter 401 of the laws of 2015, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 2. a. Every person in parental relation to a child in this state shall 5 have administered to such child an adequate dose or doses of an immuniz- 6 ing agent against poliomyelitis, mumps, measles, diphtheria, rubella, 7 varicella, Haemophilus influenzae type b (Hib), pertussis, tetanus, 8 pneumococcal disease, and hepatitis B, [which meets the standards 9 approved by the United States public health service for such biological 10 products, and which is approved by the department under such conditions 11 as may be specified by the public health council] in accordance with 12 regulations issued by the commissioner, utilizing generally accepted 13 medical standards and taking into consideration recommendations of the 14 American Academy of Pediatrics, the American Academy of Family Physi- 15 cians, the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the 16 American College of Physicians, the Advisory Committee on Immunization 17 Practices, and/or other similar nationally or internationally recognized 18 scientific organizations. 19 b. Every person in parental relation to a child in this state born on 20 or after January first, nineteen hundred ninety-four and entering sixth 21 grade or a comparable age level special education program with an unas- 22 signed grade on or after September first, two thousand seven, shall have 23 administered to such child a booster immunization containing diphtheria 24 and tetanus toxoids, and an acellular pertussis vaccine, [which meets 25 the standards approved by the United States public health service for 26 such biological products, and which is approved by the department under 27 such conditions as may be specified by the public health council] in 28 accordance with regulations issued by the commissioner, utilizing gener- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD12024-01-6 A. 10711 2 1 ally accepted medical standards and taking into consideration recommen- 2 dations of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American Academy of 3 Family Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecolo- 4 gists, the American College of Physicians, the Advisory Committee on 5 Immunization Practices, and/or other similar nationally or interna- 6 tionally recognized scientific organizations. 7 c. Every person in parental relation to a child in this state entering 8 or having entered seventh grade and twelfth grade or a comparable age 9 level special education program with an unassigned grade on or after 10 September first, two thousand sixteen, shall have administered to such 11 child an adequate dose or doses of immunizing agents against meningococ- 12 cal disease [as recommended by the advisory committee on immunization 13 practices of the centers for disease control and prevention, which meets 14 the standards approved by the United States public health service for 15 such biological products, and which is approved by the department under 16 such conditions as may be specified by the public health and planning 17 council] in accordance with regulations issued by the commissioner, 18 utilizing generally accepted medical standards and taking into consider- 19 ation recommendations of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Ameri- 20 can Academy of Family Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians 21 and Gynecologists, the American College of Physicians, the Advisory 22 Committee on Immunization Practices, and/or other similar nationally or 23 internationally recognized scientific organizations. 24 § 2. Paragraph d of subdivision 1 of section 2165 of the public health 25 law, as added by chapter 405 of the laws of 1989, is amended to read as 26 follows: 27 d. The term "immunization" means an adequate dose or doses of an 28 immunizing agent against measles, mumps and rubella [which meets the 29 standards approved by the United States public health service for such 30 biological products, and which is approved by the state department of 31 health under such conditions as may be specified by the public health 32 council] in accordance with regulations issued by the commissioner, 33 utilizing generally accepted medical standards and taking into consider- 34 ation recommendations of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Ameri- 35 can Academy of Family Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians 36 and Gynecologists, the American College of Physicians, the Advisory 37 Committee on Immunization Practices, and/or other similar nationally or 38 internationally recognized scientific organizations. 39 § 3. Paragraph c of subdivision 1 of section 2167 of the public health 40 law, as added by chapter 165 of the laws of 2003, is amended to read as 41 follows: 42 c. The term "immunization" means an adequate dose or doses of an 43 immunizing agent against meningococcal meningitis [which meets the stan- 44 dards approved by the United States public health service for such 45 biological products and which is approved by the department under such 46 conditions as may be specified by the public health council] in accord- 47 ance with regulations issued by the commissioner, utilizing generally 48 accepted medical standards and taking into consideration recommendations 49 of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American Academy of Family 50 Physicians, the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the 51 American College of Physicians, the Advisory Committee on Immunization 52 Practices, and/or other similar nationally or internationally recognized 53 scientific organizations. 54 § 4. Subdivision 7 of section 6527 of the education law, as amended by 55 chapter 555 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: A. 10711 3 1 7. A licensed physician may prescribe and order a patient specific 2 order or non-patient specific regimen to a licensed pharmacist, pursuant 3 to regulations promulgated by the commissioner, and consistent with the 4 public health law, for: (a) administering immunizations to prevent 5 influenza and COVID-19 to patients two years of age or older; and (b) 6 administering immunizations to prevent pneumococcal, acute herpes zost- 7 er, hepatitis A, hepatitis B, human papillomavirus, measles, mumps, 8 rubella, varicella, [COVID-19,] meningococcal, tetanus, diphtheria or 9 pertussis disease and medications required for emergency treatment of 10 anaphylaxis to patients eighteen years of age or older; and (c) adminis- 11 tering other immunizations [recommended by the advisory committee on 12 immunization practices of the centers for disease control and 13 prevention] for patients eighteen years of age or older if the commis- 14 sioner of health in consultation with the commissioner determines that 15 an immunization: (i) (A) may be safely administered by a licensed phar- 16 macist within their lawful scope of practice; and (B) is needed to 17 prevent the transmission of a reportable communicable disease that is 18 prevalent in New York state; or (ii) is a recommended immunization for 19 such patients who: (A) meet age requirements, (B) lack documentation of 20 such immunization, (C) lack evidence of past infection, or (D) have an 21 additional risk factor or another indication [as recommended by the 22 advisory committee on immunization practices of the centers for disease 23 control and prevention]. Nothing in this subdivision shall authorize 24 unlicensed persons to administer immunizations, vaccines or other drugs. 25 § 5. Paragraph a of subdivision 22 of section 6802 of the education 26 law, as amended by chapter 802 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read 27 as follows: 28 a. (1) the direct application of an immunizing agent to adults, wheth- 29 er by injection, ingestion, inhalation or any other means, pursuant to a 30 patient specific order or non-patient specific regimen prescribed or 31 ordered by a physician or certified nurse practitioner, for: immuniza- 32 tions to prevent influenza, pneumococcal, acute herpes zoster, hepatitis 33 A, hepatitis B, human papillomavirus, measles, mumps, rubella, varicel- 34 la, COVID-19, meningococcal, tetanus, diphtheria or pertussis disease 35 and medications required for emergency treatment of anaphylaxis; and 36 other immunizations [recommended by the advisory committee on immuniza- 37 tion practices of the centers for disease control and prevention] for 38 patients eighteen years of age or older if the commissioner of health in 39 consultation with the commissioner determines that an immunization: 40 (i)(A) may be safely administered by a licensed pharmacist within their 41 lawful scope of practice; and (B) is needed to prevent the transmission 42 of a reportable communicable disease that is prevalent in New York 43 state; or (ii) is a recommended immunization for such patients who: (A) 44 meet age requirements, (B) lack documentation of such immunization, (C) 45 lack evidence of past infection, or (D) have an additional risk factor 46 or another indication [as recommended by the advisory committee on 47 immunization practices of the centers for disease control and 48 prevention]. If the commissioner of health determines that there is an 49 outbreak of disease, or that there is the imminent threat of an outbreak 50 of disease, then the commissioner of health may issue a non-patient 51 specific regimen applicable statewide. 52 (2) the direct application of an immunizing agent to children between 53 the ages of two and eighteen years of age, whether by injection, inges- 54 tion, inhalation or any other means, pursuant to a patient specific 55 order or non-patient specific regimen prescribed or ordered by a physi- 56 cian or certified nurse practitioner, for immunization to prevent influ- A. 10711 4 1 enza, COVID-19, and medications required for emergency treatment of 2 anaphylaxis resulting from such immunization. If the commissioner of 3 health determines that there is an outbreak of influenza or COVID-19, or 4 that there is the imminent threat of an outbreak of influenza or COVID- 5 19, then the commissioner of health may issue a non-patient specific 6 regimen applicable statewide. 7 § 6. Subdivision 7 of section 6909 of the education law, as amended by 8 chapter 555 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 9 7. A certified nurse practitioner may prescribe and order a patient 10 specific order or non-patient specific regimen to a licensed pharmacist, 11 pursuant to regulations promulgated by the commissioner, and consistent 12 with the public health law, for: (a) administering immunizations to 13 prevent influenza and COVID-19 to patients two years of age or older; 14 and (b) administering immunizations to prevent pneumococcal, acute 15 herpes zoster, hepatitis A, hepatitis B, human papillomavirus, measles, 16 mumps, rubella, varicella, [COVID-19,] meningococcal, tetanus, diphthe- 17 ria or pertussis disease and medications required for emergency treat- 18 ment of anaphylaxis to patients eighteen years of age or older; and (c) 19 administering other immunizations [recommended by the advisory committee 20 on immunization practices of the centers for disease control and 21 prevention] for patients eighteen years of age or older if the commis- 22 sioner of health in consultation with the commissioner determines that 23 an immunization: (i) (A) may be safely administered by a licensed phar- 24 macist within their lawful scope of practice; and (B) is needed to 25 prevent the transmission of a reportable communicable disease that is 26 prevalent in New York state; or (ii) is a recommended immunization for 27 such patients who: (A) meet age requirements, (B) lack documentation of 28 such immunization, (C) lack evidence of past infection, or (D) have an 29 additional risk factor or another indication [as recommended by the 30 advisory committee on immunization practices of the centers for disease 31 control and prevention]. Nothing in this subdivision shall authorize 32 unlicensed persons to administer immunizations, vaccines or other drugs. 33 § 7. Paragraph (e) of subdivision 2 and paragraph a of subdivision 4 34 of section 6801 of the education law, as amended by section 1 of part DD 35 of chapter 57 of the laws of 2018, are amended to read as follows: 36 (e) administer the immunization or immunizations according to [the 37 most current recommendations by the advisory committee for immunization 38 practices (ACIP), provided however, that a pharmacist may administer any 39 immunization authorized under this section when specified by] a patient 40 specific order or non-patient specific regimen. 41 [a.] (a) a clearly visible posting of the most current "Recommended 42 Adult Immunization Schedule" published [by the advisory committee for 43 immunization practices (ACIP)] on the department of health's website; 44 and 45 § 8. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 2803-j of the public 46 health law, as added by chapter 62 of the laws of 1996, is amended to 47 read as follows: 48 (a) The commissioner shall establish an immunization schedule for 49 newborn children. The immunization schedule shall chart out recommended 50 immunizations against certain diseases and illnesses and age-appropriate 51 times for the administration of each immunization. The immunization 52 schedule shall also include information on the importance of getting 53 children immunized at the recommended ages. The immunization schedule 54 shall also include the toll-free telephone number operated by the 55 department as part of its immunization education efforts. The immuniza- 56 tion schedule shall be in accordance with recommendations established by A. 10711 5 1 the New York state department of health [and the immunization practices 2 advisory committee of the United States department of health and human 3 services]. 4 § 9. Subdivision 13 of section 131 of the social services law, as 5 added by chapter 61 of the laws of 1996, is amended to read as follows: 6 13. Social services districts shall provide all applicants and recipi- 7 ents of public assistance with children five years of age or less with 8 information and a schedule regarding age-appropriate immunizations for 9 children in accordance with the recommendations of the department of 10 health [and the immunization practices advisory committee of the United 11 States department of health and human services]. The telephone number of 12 the local county health department shall be included on the immunization 13 schedule. 14 § 10. This act shall take effect immediately.